Vermont statutes. Title 11 Corporations, Partnerships, and Associations
Subchapter 7. Miscellaneous Regulatory Provisions

§ 870.
Articles of incorporation for licensing authority.

A domestic or foreign professional corporation authorized to transact business in this State may not render professional services in this State until it delivers a certified copy of its articles of incorporation for filing to each licensing authority with jurisdiction over a professional service described in the articles.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

See note set out under chapter 4 of this title.

§ 871.
Annual report for Secretary of State.

The annual report required by 11A V.S.A. § 16.22 for each domestic professional corporation, and for each foreign professional corporation authorized to transact business in this State, must include a statement that all of its shareholders, not less than one-half of its directors, and all of its officers, other than its secretary and treasurer (if any), are qualified persons with respect to the corporation, except as provided in section 881 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 872.
Licensing authority’s regulatory jurisdiction.

This chapter does not restrict the jurisdiction of a licensing authority over individuals rendering a professional service within the jurisdiction of the licensing authority, nor does it affect the interpretation or application of any law pertaining to standards of professional conduct.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 873.
Penalty for signing false document.

A person commits an offense if he or she signs a document he or she knows is false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the licensing authority for filing.

An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed $1,000.00.

The offense created by this section is in addition to any other offense created by law for the same conduct.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.